Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.300

Termination, suspension, or continuance of commission.

In the seventh year following the inception of the commission, a referendum shall be conducted by the department of agriculture to determine if the commission is still desired by the beekeeping industry in Washington. The commission shall continue if the director finds that affected apiarists and brokers voting in a referendum conducted as for an assessment increase in RCW 15.62.140(4) voted in favor of such continuance, otherwise it shall be terminated or suspended as in RCW 15.62.310.

[ 1989 c 5 s 25.]